Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1058
Wireless carrier, defined.

Wireless carrier means (1) any carrier of mobile service as referenced in 47 U.S.C. 153(33), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, (2) any carrier of commercial mobile service as referenced in 47 U.S.C. 332(d)(1), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, (3) any carrier of commercial mobile radio service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 20.3, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, (4) any cellular radiotelephone service as referenced in subpart H of 47 C.F.R. 22, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, (5) any licensees of a personal communications service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 24, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, or (6) any specialized mobile radio services as referenced in subpart S of 47 C.F.R. 90, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 257;

Laws 2006, LB 1222, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB661, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-456;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 40.